src/lexverb.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +V +1p +2p +3p +sg +pl +mInd +mSub +mCond +mImp +tFut +tPres +tImp +tPret +pastPart +Gerund +Inf ^GV1 ^GV2 ^GV3
!Verbs ending in ar
LEXICON Verb1
+V+1p+sg+tPres+mInd:^o #;
+V+2p+sg+tPres+mInd:^as #;
+V+3p+sg+tPres+mInd:^a #;
+V+1p+pl+tPres+mInd:^amos #;
+V+2p+pl+tPres+mInd:^áis #;
+V+3p+pl+tPres+mInd:^an #;

+V+1p+sg+tImp+mInd:^aba #;
+V+2p+sg+tImp+mInd:^abas #;
+V+3p+sg+tImp+mInd:^aba #;
+V+1p+pl+tImp+mInd:^ábamos #;
+V+2p+pl+tImp+mInd:^abais #;
+V+3p+pl+tImp+mInd:^aban #;

+V+1p+sg+tPret:^é #;
+V+2p+sg+tPret:^aste #;
+V+3p+sg+tPret:^ó #;
+V+1p+pl+tPret:^amos #;
+V+2p+pl+tPret:^asteis #;
+V+3p+pl+tPret:^aron #;

+V+1p+sg+tFut+mInd:^^é #;
+V+2p+sg+tFut+mInd:^^ás #;
+V+3p+sg+tFut+mInd:^^á #;
+V+1p+pl+tFut+mInd:^^emos #;
+V+2p+pl+tFut+mInd:^^éis #;
+V+3p+pl+tFut+mInd:^^án #;

+V+1p+sg+mCond:^^ía #;
+V+2p+sg+mCond:^^ía #;
+V+3p+sg+mCond:^^ía #;
+V+1p+pl+mCond:^^íamos #;
+V+2p+pl+mCond:^^íais #;
+V+3p+pl+mCond:^^ían #;

+V+1p+sg+tPres+mSub:^e #;
+V+2p+sg+tPres+mSub:^es #;
+V+3p+sg+tPres+mSub:^e #;
+V+1p+pl+tPres+mSub:^emos #;
+V+2p+pl+tPres+mSub:^éis #;
+V+3p+pl+tPres+mSub:^en #;

+V+1p+sg+tImp+mSub:^ara #;
+V+2p+sg+tImp+mSub:^aras #;
+V+3p+sg+tImp+mSub:^ara #;
+V+1p+pl+tImp+mSub:^áramos #;
+V+2p+pl+tImp+mSub:^arais #;
+V+3p+pl+tImp+mSub:^aran #;
+V+1p+sg+tImp+mSub:^ase #;
+V+2p+sg+tImp+mSub:^ases #;
+V+3p+sg+tImp+mSub:^ase #;
+V+1p+pl+tImp+mSub:^ásemos #;
+V+2p+pl+tImp+mSub:^aseis #;
+V+3p+pl+tImp+mSub:^asen #;

+V+1p+sg+tFut+mSub:^are #;
+V+2p+sg+tFut+mSub:^ares #;
+V+3p+sg+tFut+mSub:^are #;
+V+1p+pl+tFut+mSub:^áremos #;
+V+2p+pl+tFut+mSub:^areis #;
+V+3p+pl+tFut+mSub:^aren #;

+V+pastPart:^ado #;

+V+Gerund:^ando #;

+Inf:0 #;
!Verbs ending in er
LEXICON Verb2
+V+1p+sg+tPres+mInd:^o #;
+V+2p+sg+tPres+mInd:^es #;
+V+3p+sg+tPres+mInd:^e #;
+V+1p+pl+tPres+mInd:^emos #;
+V+2p+pl+tPres+mInd:^éis #;
+V+3p+pl+tPres+mInd:^en #;

+V+1p+sg+tImp+mInd:^ía #;
+V+2p+sg+tImp+mInd:^ías #;
+V+3p+sg+tImp+mInd:^ía #;
+V+1p+pl+tImp+mInd:^íamos #;
+V+2p+pl+tImp+mInd:^íais #;
+V+3p+pl+tImp+mInd:^ían #;


+V+1p+sg+tPret:^í #;
+V+2p+sg+tPret:^iste #;
+V+3p+sg+tPret:^ió #;
+V+1p+pl+tPret:^imos #;
+V+2p+pl+tPret:^isteis #;
+V+3p+pl+tPret:^ieron #;

+V+1p+sg+tFut+mInd:^^é #;
+V+2p+sg+tFut+mInd:^^ás #;
+V+3p+sg+tFut+mInd:^^ás #;
+V+1p+pl+tFut+mInd:^^emos #;
+V+2p+pl+tFut+mInd:^^éis #;
+V+3p+pl+tFut+mInd:^^án #;

+V+1p+sg+mCond:^^ía #;
+V+2p+sg+mCond:^^ía #;
+V+3p+sg+mCond:^^ía #;
+V+1p+pl+mCond:^^íamos #;
+V+2p+pl+mCond:^^íais #;
+V+3p+pl+mCond:^^ían #;

+V+1p+sg+tPres+mSub:^a #;
+V+2p+sg+tPres+mSub:^as #;
+V+3p+sg+tPres+mSub:^a #;
+V+1p+pl+tPres+mSub:^amos #;
+V+2p+pl+tPres+mSub:^áis #;
+V+3p+pl+tPres+mSub:^an #;

+V+1p+sg+tImp+mSub:^iera #;
+V+2p+sg+tImp+mSub:^ieras #;
+V+3p+sg+tImp+mSub:^iera #;
+V+1p+pl+tImp+mSub:^iéramos #;
+V+2p+pl+tImp+mSub:^ierais #;
+V+3p+pl+tImp+mSub:^ieran #;
+V+1p+sg+tImp+mSub:^iese #;
+V+2p+sg+tImp+mSub:^ieses #;
+V+3p+sg+tImp+mSub:^iese #;
+V+1p+pl+tImp+mSub:^iésemos #;
+V+2p+pl+tImp+mSub:^ieseis #;
+V+3p+pl+tImp+mSub:^iesen #;

+V+1p+sg+tFut+mSub:^iere #;
+V+2p+sg+tFut+mSub:^ieres #;
+V+3p+sg+tFut+mSub:^iere #;
+V+1p+pl+tFut+mSub:^iéremos #;
+V+2p+pl+tFut+mSub:^iereis #;
+V+3p+pl+tFut+mSub:^ieren #;

+V+pastPart:^ido #;

+V+Gerund:^iendo #;

+Inf:0 #;
!Verbs ending in ir
LEXICON Verb3
+V+1p+sg+tPres+mInd:^o #;
+V+2p+sg+tPres+mInd:^es #;
+V+3p+sg+tPres+mInd:^e #;
+V+1p+pl+tPres+mInd:^imos #;
+V+2p+pl+tPres+mInd:^ís #;
+V+3p+pl+tPres+mInd:^en #;

+V+1p+sg+tImp+mInd:^ía #;
+V+2p+sg+tImp+mInd:^ías #;
+V+3p+sg+tImp+mInd:^ía #;
+V+1p+pl+tImp+mInd:^íamos #;
+V+2p+pl+tImp+mInd:^íais #;
+V+3p+pl+tImp+mInd:^ían #;

+V+1p+sg+tPret:^í #;
+V+2p+sg+tPret:^iste #;
+V+3p+sg+tPret:^ió #;
+V+1p+pl+tPret:^imos #;
+V+2p+pl+tPret:^isteis #;
+V+3p+pl+tPret:^ieron #;

+V+1p+sg+tFut+mInd:^^é #;
+V+2p+sg+tFut+mInd:^^ás #;
+V+3p+sg+tFut+mInd:^^ás #;
+V+1p+pl+tFut+mInd:^^emos #;
+V+2p+pl+tFut+mInd:^^éis #;
+V+3p+pl+tFut+mInd:^^án #;

+V+1p+sg+mCond:^^ía #;
+V+2p+sg+mCond:^^ía #;
+V+3p+sg+mCond:^^ía #;
+V+1p+pl+mCond:^^íamos #;
+V+2p+pl+mCond:^^íais #;
+V+3p+pl+mCond:^^ían #;

+V+1p+sg+tPres+mSub:^a #;
+V+2p+sg+tPres+mSub:^as #;
+V+3p+sg+tPres+mSub:^a #;
+V+1p+pl+tPres+mSub:^amos #;
+V+2p+pl+tPres+mSub:^áis #;
+V+3p+pl+tPres+mSub:^an #;

+V+1p+sg+tImp+mSub:^iera #;
+V+2p+sg+tImp+mSub:^ieras #;
+V+3p+sg+tImp+mSub:^iera #;
+V+1p+pl+tImp+mSub:^iéramos #;
+V+2p+pl+tImp+mSub:^ierais #;
+V+3p+pl+tImp+mSub:^ieran #;
+V+1p+sg+tImp+mSub:^iese #;
+V+2p+sg+tImp+mSub:^ieses #;
+V+3p+sg+tImp+mSub:^iese #;
+V+1p+pl+tImp+mSub:^iésemos #;
+V+2p+pl+tImp+mSub:^ieseis #;
+V+3p+pl+tImp+mSub:^iesen #;

+V+1p+sg+tFut+mSub:^iere #;
+V+2p+sg+tFut+mSub:^ieres #;
+V+3p+sg+tFut+mSub:^iere #;
+V+1p+pl+tFut+mSub:^iéremos #;
+V+2p+pl+tFut+mSub:^iereis #;
+V+3p+pl+tFut+mSub:^ieren #;

+V+pastPart:^ido #;

+V+Gerund:^iendo #;
+Inf:0 #;

LEXICON Root
abombar  Verb1;
abrumar  Verb1;
acaudalar  Verb1;
aclarar  Verb1;
acosar  Verb1;
acostar  Verb1;
aderezar  Verb1;
adular  Verb1;
afrentar  Verb1;
agorar  Verb1;
agorar  Verb1;
ajusticiar  Verb1;
alegorizar  Verb1;
aliviar  Verb1;
amar  Verb1;
amoldar  Verb1;
analizar  Verb1;
anular  Verb1;
apedrear  Verb1;
aplacar  Verb1;
apretar  Verb1;
arar  Verb1;
arreglar  Verb1;
arrostrar  Verb1;
aseverar  Verb1;
asustar  Verb1;
atestar  Verb1;
atragantar  Verb1;
auspiciar  Verb1;
avergonzar  Verb1;
azuzar  Verb1;
barruntar  Verb1;
blandear  Verb1;
brillar  Verb1;
cacarear  Verb1;
calumniar  Verb1;
cansar  Verb1;
carraspear  Verb1;
cavar  Verb1;
centuplicar  Verb1;
citar  Verb1;
cocinar  Verb1;
colocar  Verb1;
compensar  Verb1;
concordar  Verb1;
confiscar  Verb1;
conmutar  Verb1;
consultar  Verb1;
contratar  Verb1;
cortejar  Verb1;
croar  Verb1;
culminar  Verb1;
chapotear  Verb1;
chinchinear  Verb1;
chuzar  Verb1;
decapitar  Verb1;
degollar  Verb1;
demorar  Verb1;
depurar  Verb1;
desacreditar  Verb1;
desaprovechar  Verb1;
desbocar  Verb1;
descolgar  Verb1;
desdoblar  Verb1;
desenlazar  Verb1;
desgraciar  Verb1;
deslindar  Verb1;
desmoralizar  Verb1;
desparramar  Verb1;
desplegar  Verb1;
destapar  Verb1;
desviar  Verb1;
diagnosticar  Verb1;
dar  Verb1;
disimular  Verb1;
divinizar  Verb1;
dar  Verb1;
egresar  Verb1;
embarazar  Verb1;
embrollar  Verb1;
empatar  Verb1;
emular  Verb1;
encarar  Verb1;
encontrar  Verb1;
enfadar  Verb1;
englobar  Verb1;
enmarañar  Verb1;
ensañar  Verb1;
entrar  Verb1;
envasar  Verb1;
erradicar  Verb1;
escatimar  Verb1;
especializar  Verb1;
estabilizar  Verb1;
estar  Verb1;
estrellar  Verb1;
evidenciar  Verb1;
excusar  Verb1;
expresar  Verb1;
facturar  Verb1;
fechar  Verb1;
firmar  Verb1;
frecuentar  Verb1;
generalizar  Verb1;
guerrear  Verb1;
hipnotizar  Verb1;
idealizar  Verb1;
incautar  Verb1;
influenciar  Verb1;
insuflar  Verb1;
invocar  Verb1;
laminar  Verb1;
litigar  Verb1;
malversar  Verb1;
mascar  Verb1;
mestizar  Verb1;
motejar  Verb1;
nivelar  Verb1;
olfatear  Verb1;
pactar  Verb1;
patrocionar  Verb1;
personificar  Verb1;
plasmar  Verb1;
preconizar  Verb1;
procurar  Verb1;
pugnar  Verb1;
ramificar  Verb1;
rebozar  Verb1;
recular  Verb1;
regañar  Verb1;
remediar  Verb1;
representar  Verb1;
resonar  Verb1;
revolcar  Verb1;
rutilar  Verb1;
segregar  Verb1;
sincronizar  Verb1;
sonorizar  Verb1;
sumar  Verb1;
televisar  Verb1;
tostar  Verb1;
traumatizar  Verb1;
ufanar  Verb1;
ventilar  Verb1;
voltear  Verb1;
absolver  Verb2;
abstener  Verb2;
abstener  Verb2;
acaecer  Verb2;
acoger  Verb2;
acontecer  Verb2;
adolecer  Verb2;
agradecer  Verb2;
anochecer  Verb2;
anteponer  Verb2;
apetecer  Verb2;
aprender  Verb2;
arder  Verb2;
ascender  Verb2;
atardecer  Verb2;
atender  Verb2;
atender  Verb2;
atraer  Verb2;
atener  Verb2;
beber  Verb2;
caer  Verb2;
carecer  Verb2;
ceder  Verb2;
cocer  Verb2;
comer  Verb2;
compadecer  Verb2;
compeler  Verb2;
complacer  Verb2;
comprender  Verb2;
componer  Verb2;
concomer  Verb2;
condoler  Verb2;
conocer  Verb2;
contender  Verb2;
contender  Verb2;
contraer  Verb2;
contraer  Verb2;
convalecer  Verb2;
converger  Verb2;
corresponder  Verb2;
corromper  Verb2;
coser  Verb2;
creer  Verb2;
cocer  Verb2;
deber  Verb2;
decrecer  Verb2;
demoler  Verb2;
deponer  Verb2;
desatender  Verb2;
descomponer  Verb2;
descorrer  Verb2;
desentender  Verb2;
desfallecer  Verb2;
desobedecer  Verb2;
desprender  Verb2;
desvanecer  Verb2;
devolver  Verb2;
disponer  Verb2;
distraer  Verb2;
doler  Verb2;
embeber  Verb2;
embrutecer  Verb2;
empalidecer  Verb2;
empobrecer  Verb2;
enaltecer  Verb2;
encanecer  Verb2;
encender  Verb2;
endurecer  Verb2;
enfurecer  Verb2;
enloquecer  Verb2;
enorgullecer  Verb2;
enriquecer  Verb2;
ensoberbecer  Verb2;
ensordecer  Verb2;
enternecer  Verb2;
entorpecer  Verb2;
entretener  Verb2;
entristecer  Verb2;
entropecer  Verb2;
envanecer  Verb2;
envilecer  Verb2;
equivaler  Verb2;
escarnecer  Verb2;
escocer  Verb2;
esconder  Verb2;
establecer  Verb2;
exceder  Verb2;
expender  Verb2;
extender  Verb2;
fallecer  Verb2;
florecer  Verb2;
ser  Verb2;
guarnecer  Verb2;
hacer  Verb2;
hacer  Verb2;
hacer  Verb2;
hacer  Verb2;
hacer  Verb2;
haber  Verb2;
hacer  Verb2;
hender  Verb2;
haber  Verb2;
humedecer  Verb2;
interceder  Verb2;
joder  Verb2;
languidecer  Verb2;
mantener  Verb2;
mecer  Verb2;
moler  Verb2;
obedecer  Verb2;
oler  Verb2;
padecer  Verb2;
peder  Verb2;
permanecer  Verb2;
poder  Verb2;
preceder  Verb2;
pretender  Verb2;
prometer  Verb2;
proteger  Verb2;
caber  Verb2;
recoger  Verb2;
recorrer  Verb2;
rejuvenecer  Verb2;
remorder  Verb2;
reponer  Verb2;
resplandecer  Verb2;
retener  Verb2;
retrotraer  Verb2;
revolver  Verb2;
romper  Verb2;
saber  Verb2;
sobrecoger  Verb2;
socorrer  Verb2;
sorber  Verb2;
suceder  Verb2;
saber  Verb2;
tañer  Verb2;
tender  Verb2;
traer  Verb2;
trasponer  Verb2;
tener  Verb2;
vender  Verb2;
ver  Verb2;
yacer  Verb2;
abrir  Verb3;
acudir  Verb3;
admitir  Verb3;
aducir  Verb3;
advertir  Verb3;
advertir  Verb3;
advertir  Verb3;
afluir  Verb3;
aludir  Verb3;
apercibir  Verb3;
argüir  Verb3;
asir  Verb3;
asir  Verb3;
asir  Verb3;
asir  Verb3;
asir  Verb3;
aterir  Verb3;
aturdir  Verb3;
balbucir  Verb3;
bendecir  Verb3;
bruñir  Verb3;
ceñir  Verb3;
ceñir  Verb3;
coexistir  Verb3;
coincidir  Verb3;
comedir  Verb3;
competir  Verb3;
concebir  Verb3;
concebir  Verb3;
concluir  Verb3;
conducir  Verb3;
confluir  Verb3;
conseguir  Verb3;
consistir  Verb3;
construir  Verb3;
contradecir  Verb3;
contribuir  Verb3;
convergir  Verb3;
convenir  Verb3;
convenir  Verb3;
convivir  Verb3;
crujir  Verb3;
cumplir  Verb3;
curtir  Verb3;
decir  Verb3;
decir  Verb3;
definir  Verb3;
deprimir  Verb3;
describir  Verb3;
desdecir  Verb3;
deslucir  Verb3;
despedir  Verb3;
destruir  Verb3;
desvir  Verb3;
devenir  Verb3;
diferir  Verb3;
decir  Verb3;
decir  Verb3;
decir  Verb3;
dirimir  Verb3;
discurrir  Verb3;
disentir  Verb3;
distinguir  Verb3;
disuadir  Verb3;
divertir  Verb3;
divertir  Verb3;
elegir  Verb3;
embestir  Verb3;
emitir  Verb3;
enlucir  Verb3;
erguir  Verb3;
escabullir  Verb3;
escribir  Verb3;
escupir  Verb3;
esgrimir  Verb3;
estreñir  Verb3;
excluir  Verb3;
exigir  Verb3;
existir  Verb3;
expedir  Verb3;
extinguir  Verb3;
fingir  Verb3;
fruncir  Verb3;
fundir  Verb3;
gemir  Verb3;
henchir  Verb3;
hervir  Verb3;
hervir  Verb3;
herir  Verb3;
huir  Verb3;
ir  Verb3;
impartir  Verb3;
imprimir  Verb3;
incluir  Verb3;
incumplir  Verb3;
inducir  Verb3;
infligir  Verb3;
infringir  Verb3;
ingerir  Verb3;
inmiscuir  Verb3;
instituir  Verb3;
interrumpir  Verb3;
invadir  Verb3;
investir  Verb3;
irrumpir  Verb3;
malherir  Verb3;
medir  Verb3;
mullir  Verb3;
ocurrir  Verb3;
partir  Verb3;
perseguir  Verb3;
pedir  Verb3;
preferir  Verb3;
presidir  Verb3;
producir  Verb3;
proseguir  Verb3;
podrir  Verb3;
rebatir  Verb3;
reconstruir  Verb3;
reconvertir  Verb3;
redimir  Verb3;
refundir  Verb3;
relucir  Verb3;
repartir  Verb3;
reproducir  Verb3;
resentir  Verb3;
restituir  Verb3;
retribuir  Verb3;
revertir  Verb3;
rendir  Verb3;
salir  Verb3;
servir  Verb3;
servir  Verb3;
subir  Verb3;
sucumbir  Verb3;
sumergir  Verb3;
surtir  Verb3;
traducir  Verb3;
transgredir  Verb3;
trascurrir  Verb3;
tullir  Verb3;
urgir  Verb3;
ir  Verb3;
ir  Verb3;
